Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1289.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law not to be


codified in the Oklahoma Statutes reads as follows:


A. Effective July 1, 2026, each full-time and part-time


employee, including temporary and other limited-term employees, of


the state who was employed by the state on the last working day of


June 2026 shall be awarded an annualized salary increase equal to


five percent (5%) of the employee’s annualized salary as of June 30,


2026.


B. As used in this section, “temporary and other limited-term


employees” are those persons who:


1. Are not full-time or permanent employees;

Req. No. 2706 Page 1


2. Are not otherwise excluded by this section; and


3. Are compensated by an agency, board, commission, or other


department or other employing entity for a limited duration and


without any subjective expectation by either the employer or the


employee that the employment will become permanent.


C. Employees eligible for the increase provided for in this


section who are on leave without pay on July 1, 2026, shall receive


an annualized increase, effective upon their return to work, but


shall not receive any increase for a period of time prior to their


return to work.


D. The following individuals shall be ineligible for a pay


increase pursuant to this section, and nothing, except as otherwise


provided by Section 840-2.17 of Title 74 of the Oklahoma Statutes,


shall be construed to authorize any increase or advancement of the


salaries of:


1. Any elected official;


2. Any cabinet secretary whose salary is governed by Section


10.5 of Title 74 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


3. Any agency director;


4. Any justice or judge whose salary is governed by the


provisions of Title 85A of the Oklahoma Statutes or whose


compensation is set by the Board on Judicial Compensation pursuant


to Section 3.4 of Title 20 of the Oklahoma Statutes;



Req. No. 2706 Page 2


5. Any district attorney whose salary is governed by Section


215.30 of Title 19 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


6. Employees of institutions under the administrative authority


of the Oklahoma State Regents for Higher Education;


7. Persons employed pursuant to Section 2241 of Title 74 of the


Oklahoma Statutes;


8. Persons employed pursuant to Section 1.6a of Title 53 of the


Oklahoma Statutes;


9. Persons who are employed or under contract pursuant to


subsection B of Section 1419 of Title 10 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


and


10. The Adjutant General and Assistant Adjutants General


pursuant to Section 27 of Title 44 of the Oklahoma Statutes.


E. No salary increase pursuant to this section shall be made


that exceeds a salary limitation provided in an agency’s annual


appropriation bill or salary limits set by statute.


F. With respect to any employee who is not a full-time


employee, the salary increase amounts otherwise authorized by


subsection A of this section shall be prorated using a methodology


applicable to the employee’s compensation, weeks worked, months


worked, hours worked, or a similar method.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective July 1, 2026.


SECTION 3. It being immediately necessary for the preservation


of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby

Req. No. 2706 Page 3


declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and


be in full force from and after its passage and approval.




60-2-2706 MSBB 12/19/2025 3:04:38 PM









































Req. No. 2706 Page 4